Oklahoma, session 2026, SB959.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1-728g of Title 63, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


As used in this act, unless the context requires otherwise:

Req. No. 873 Page 1


1. “Conscience” means the ethical, moral, or religious beliefs


or principles held by a medical practitioner, health care


institution, or health care payor. With respect to institutional or


corporate persons, as opposed to individual persons, the term is


determined by reference to that entity’s or body’s governing


documents including, but not limited to, published ethical, moral,


or religious guidelines or directives, mission statements,


constitutions, articles of incorporation, bylaws, policies, or


regulations;


2. a. “Discrimination” means an adverse action taken


against, or a threat of adverse action communicated


to, a medical practitioner, health care institution,


or health care payor as a result of the medical


practitioner, health care institution, or health care


payor’s refusal to participate in a health care


service on the basis of conscience including, but not


limited to, termination of employment; transfer from


current position; demotion from current position;


adverse administrative action; reassignment to a


different shift or job title; increased administrative


duties; denial of staff privileges; denial of board


certification; loss of career specialty; reduction of


wages, benefits, or privileges; refusal to award a


grant, contract, or other program; refusal to provide

Req. No. 873 Page 2


residency training opportunities; denial, deprivation,


or disqualification of licensure; withholding or


disqualifying from financial aid and other assistance;


impediment of the creation or improvement of a health


care institution or health care payor; impediment of


the acquisition or merger of a health care institution


or health care payor; the threat of any of the


preceding actions; or any other penalty, disciplinary,


or retaliatory action, whether executed or threatened.


b. The term does not include the negotiation or purchase


of insurance by a nongovernment entity;


3. “Health care institution” means a public or private


hospital, outpatient center for primary care, medical center,


physician organization, professional association, outpatient center


for surgical services, private physician’s office, pharmacy, long-


term care facility, medical school, nursing school, medical training


facility, or any other entity or location in which health care


services are performed. The term includes, but is not limited to,


organizations, corporations, partnerships, associations, agencies,


networks, sole proprietorships, or joint ventures;


4. “Health care payor” means an employer, health plan, health


maintenance organization, insurance company, management services


organization, or another entity that pays for or arranges for


payment for a health care service, in whole or in part;

Req. No. 873 Page 3


5. “Health care service” means medical research or medical care


provided to a patient or client at any time during the patient’s or


client’s course of treatment including, but not limited to, initial


examination; testing; diagnosis; referral; dispensing or


administration of a drug, medication, or device; psychological


therapy or counseling; research; prognosis; therapy; record-making


procedures; notes related to treatment, set up, or performance of a


surgery or procedure; or any other care or service performed or


provided by a medical practitioner;


6. “Medical practitioner” means a person who is or may be asked


to participate in a health care service. The term includes, but is


not limited to, physicians; physician assistants; nurses including,


but not limited to, Advanced Practice Registered Nurses; nurse


aides; allied health professionals; medical assistants; hospital


employees; employees of an outpatient center for primary care,


outpatient center for surgical services, or long-term care facility;


pharmacists; pharmacy technicians; pharmacy employees; medical


school faculty and students; nursing school faculty and students;


psychology and counseling faculty and students; medical researchers;


laboratory technicians; counselors; social workers; or any other


person who facilitates or participates in a health care service;


7. “Participate in a health care service” means to provide,


perform, assist with, facilitate, refer for, counsel for, advise



Req. No. 873 Page 4


with regard to, admit for the purposes of providing, or take part in


any way in providing a health care service; and


8. “Person” means one or more individuals, partnerships,


associations, or corporations.


SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1-728h of Title 63, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. A health care institution or health care payor may not be


required to participate in or pay for a health care service that


violates the health care institution’s or health care payor’s


conscience, including by permitting the use of its facilities.


B. Except as provided in subsection D of this section, refusal


to participate in or pay for a health care service under this


section may not give rise to liability of the health care


institution or health care payor for damages allegedly arising from


the refusal or be the basis for any discrimination, discipline, or


other recriminatory action against the health care institution,


health care payor, or any personnel, agent, or governing board.


C. Nothing in this section may be construed to relieve a health


care institution of the requirement to provide emergency medical


treatment to all patients set forth in the federal Emergency Medical


Treatment and Labor Act, 42 U.S.C., Section 1395dd.





Req. No. 873 Page 5


D. The immunity provisions of this section do not apply to a


health care institution or health care payor owned or operated by


this state or a political subdivision of the state.


E. Notwithstanding any other provision of this act to the


contrary, a religious medical practitioner, health care institution,


or health care payor that holds itself out to the public as


religious, states in its governing documents that it has a religious


purpose or mission, or has internal operating policies or procedures


that implement its religious beliefs, shall have the right to make


employment, staffing, contracting, and admitting privilege decisions


consistent with its religious beliefs.


SECTION 3. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1-728i of Title 63, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. A medical practitioner has the right not to participate in a


health care service that violates the medical practitioner’s


conscience. A health care institution may not be held liable for


the exercise of conscience not to participate in a health care


service by a medical practitioner employed, contracted, or granted


admitting privileges by the health care institution.


B. A health care institution may require the exercise of


conscience as a basis for not participating in a health care service


to be made in writing and signed by the medical practitioner



Req. No. 873 Page 6


objecting. A writing made under this subsection may refer only


generally to the grounds of conscience.


C. A medical practitioner’s refusal to participate in a health


care service based on an exercise of conscience may not be a


consideration with respect to staff privileges of a health care


institution or basis for discrimination, discipline, or other


recriminatory action against the medical practitioner.


D. A medical practitioner may not be held liable for damages


allegedly arising from the exercise of conscience not to participate


in a health care service.


SECTION 4. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1-728j of Title 63, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


The exercise of conscience not to participate in a health care


service by a medical practitioner, health care institution, or


health care payor may not be grounds for loss of any privileges or


immunities or for the loss of any public benefits.


SECTION 5. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1-728k of Title 63, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. A medical practitioner or health care institution may not be


discriminated against because the medical practitioner or health


care institution:



Req. No. 873 Page 7


1. Provides, causes to be provided, or intends to provide or


cause to be provided information relating to a suspected violation


of this act to the medical practitioner or health care institution’s


employer, the Attorney General, the United States Department of


Health and Human Services, or any state or federal agency charged


with protecting health care rights of conscience; or


2. Testifies, assists, participates, or intends to testify,


assist, or participate in a proceeding concerning a violation of


this act.


B. Except as provided in subsection C of this section, it is


unlawful to discriminate against a medical practitioner because the


medical practitioner discloses information that the medical


practitioner reasonably believes evidences:


1. A violation of any law, rule, or regulation;


2. A violation of any standard of care or ethical guidelines


for the provision of any health care service; or


3. Gross mismanagement, a gross waste of funds, an abuse of


authority, practices or methods of treatment that may put patient


health at risk, or a substantial and specific danger to public


health or safety.


C. Nothing in this section may be construed to exempt a person


from any applicable state or federal confidentiality and patient


privacy requirements including, but not limited to, the federal



Req. No. 873 Page 8


Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996, 42


U.S.C., Section 1320d et seq.


SECTION 6. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1-728l of Title 63, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. A professional licensing board or other state agency that


grants licensure or certification may not reprimand, sanction, or


revoke or threaten to revoke a license, certificate, or registration


of a medical practitioner who is licensed or certified by the board


or agency for engaging in speech or expressive activity protected


under the First Amendment to the United States Constitution, unless


the board or agency demonstrates beyond a reasonable doubt that the


medical practitioner’s speech was the direct cause of physical harm


to a person with whom the medical practitioner had a practitioner-


patient relationship within the three (3) years immediately


preceding the incident of physical harm.


B. 1. Within fourteen (14) calendar days of receiving a


complaint that may result in revocation of a medical practitioner’s


license, certificate, or registration, the board or agency shall


provide the medical practitioner with a copy of the complaint.


2. If the board or agency fails to provide the complaint within


fourteen (14) calendar days of receipt, the board or agency shall


pay the medical practitioner an administrative penalty of Five


Hundred Dollars ($500.00) for each week of noncompliance.

Req. No. 873 Page 9


SECTION 7. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1-728m of Title 63, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. It is unlawful to interfere or attempt to interfere with the


right not to participate in a health care service or the


whistleblower and free speech rights and protections authorized by


this act, whether by duress, coercion, or any other means.


B. A medical practitioner, health care institution, or health


care payor injured by unlawful interference is entitled to:


1. Injunctive relief, when appropriate, including but not


limited to reinstatement of a medical practitioner to the medical


practitioner’s previous position, reinstatement of board


certification, and relicensure of a health care institution or


health care payor;


2. Monetary damages for injuries suffered; and


3. Reasonable costs and attorney fees.


SECTION 8. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1-728n of Title 63, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


The Insurance Commissioner shall promulgate reasonable and


necessary rules concerning the implementation of this act relating


to those insurers under its jurisdiction.





Req. No. 873 Page 10


SECTION 9. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1-728o of Title 63, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


This act is supplemental to and may not be construed as


modifying or limiting the rights and remedies provided in the


Freedom of Conscience Act, Section 1-728a et seq. of Title 63 of the


Oklahoma Statutes.


SECTION 10. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.




60-1-873 DC 1/19/2025 5:46:44 AM





























Req. No. 873 Page 11